District of Columbia statutes.
2-1223.01

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 101, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 3(a)(1), 52 DCR 1161
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, §§ 13, 14(a), 121(a), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689
Section 104(b) of Law 17-138 provided that this section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.
Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 15-257 provided: “(b) This section shall not apply until the effective date of the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Act of 2004, signed by the Mayor on August 5, 2004 (D.C. Act 15-527; 51 DCR 9142) [December 7, 2004].”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Clarification Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-64, April 20, 2005, 52 DCR 4135).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provides that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
“Sec. 601. Subtitle P of Title II of the Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Act of 2007, signed by the Mayor on June 28, 2007 (D.C. Act 17-63), is repealed.”
“TITLE VI. CONFORMING AMENDMENTS.
“(b) This section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”
“Sec. 104. (a) The Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Act of 2004, effective December 7, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-219; D.C. Official Code § 2-1223.01 et seq.), is repealed.
“(b) This section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.
“Sec. 103. (a) The National Capital Revitalization Corporation Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-144; D.C. Official Code § 2-1219.01 et seq.), is repealed.
D.C. Law 17-53, §§ 103, 104, and 601 repealed provisions as follows: